Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 2 General Provisions
63-6-237. Radiologist assistants.

In addition to the practice permitted by § 63-6-902, a radiologist may utilize the services of a radiologist assistant to practice radiology assistance under the supervision of such radiologist to the extent not prohibited by § 63-6-902.

The board of medical examiners shall define the scope of practice of a radiologist assistant and the educational qualifications necessary to practice as a radiologist assistant by rules promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. Such rules shall be consistent with guidelines adopted by the American College of Radiology, the American Society of Radiologic Technologists and the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists (ARRT).

A radiologist assistant must be a radiologic technologist certified by the board of medical examiners under § 63-6-902 and certified and registered with ARRT and credentialed to provide radiology services under the supervision of a radiologist.

A radiologist assistant may not interpret images, make diagnoses or prescribe medications or therapies.

On or after July 1, 2004, a radiology practitioner assistant shall only be known as a radiologist assistant.

On or after July 1, 2008, any person seeking to become a radiologist assistant in Tennessee must have completed an advanced academic program encompassing a nationally recognized radiologist assistant curriculum, as well as completed a radiologist directed clinical preceptorship, all culminating in a baccalaureate degree.

Any person who, on or before December 31, 2008, was practicing as a radiology practitioner assistant in Tennessee and who submits satisfactory proof of that practice to the board, along with an application and the certification fee on or before December 31, 2009, shall be entitled to be certified by the board as a radiologist assistant without having to meet the educational, certification, registration, credentialing or examination requirements of subsections (b) and (c) and rules promulgated pursuant to subsections (b) and (c).

Acts 2004, ch. 704, § 1; 2007, ch. 393, § 1; 2008, ch. 1003, §§ 1-3.

Compiler's Notes. References to “63-6-224” throughout this section were changed to “63-6-902” in light of the transfer of section 63-6-224 to 63-6-902 by the Code Commission in 2016, effective January 1, 2017.

63-6-238. Notice to patients of departure.

Psychiatrists are not required to notify patients that were treated by them at community mental health centers, as defined in § 33-1-101, of their departure from such community mental health centers. Patient records shall remain with the community mental health centers. The transfer of patients' records shall be in compliance with standards set by state and federal law.

Acts 2005, ch. 53, § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2010, ch. 904, § 2 purported to add a new section concerning remedial action against persons licensed to practice medicine who are required to register as a sexual offender or violent sexual offender in order to assure safety as § 63-6-238. Since Acts 2005, ch. 53, § 3 added § 63-6-238, ch. 904, § 2 was added as § 63-6-240.

63-6-239. [Repealed.]

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 3; repealed by Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 5, effective January 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Section 63-6-239 concerning prescriptions for Schedule II controlled substances is repealed by Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 5, effective January 1, 2019.

Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 10 provided that the commissioner of health is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. All rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, title 4, chapter 5.

Former § 63-6-239 concerned prescriptions for Schedule II controlled substances.

63-6-240. Remedial action against persons licensed to practice medicine who are required to register as a sexual offender or violent sexual offender in order to assure safety.

The general assembly finds that a person who is licensed to practice medicine in this state and who is required to register with the Tennessee bureau of investigation (TBI) as a sexual offender or violent sexual offender is injurious to the public safety, health and welfare as well as the public's perception of and confidence in the medical profession.

The general assembly further finds that the strongest remedial action possible should be taken against a person's license to practice medicine when such person has been convicted of a sexual offense, or violent sexual offense as both are defined in title 40, chapter 39, part 2, and continues to engage in the practice of medicine in this state after such conviction.

Enactment of this section by the general assembly is declared to be a remedial action necessary to assure the safety of the citizens of this state and their faith and confidence in the medical profession. This section is not to be construed to be punitive against any person to whom this section may apply.

As used in this section:

“Registering agency” means a sheriff's office, municipal police department, metropolitan police department, campus law enforcement agency, the Tennessee department of correction, a private contractor with the Tennessee department of correction or the board with whom sexual offenders and violent sexual offenders are required to register under title 40, chapter 39, part 2;

“Registry” means the registry created by the Tennessee Sexual Offender and Violent Sexual Offender Registration, Verification and Tracking Act of 2004, codified in title 40, chapter 39, part 2;

“Sexual offense” means those offenses defined as “sexual offenses” in § 40-39-202; and

“Violent sexual offense” means those offenses defined as “violent sexual offenses” in § 40-39-202.

If the registering agency of a person who registers as a sexual offender or violent sexual offender, as defined by title 40, chapter 39, part 2, has reason to believe that such person is licensed to practice medicine in this state pursuant to this chapter, the registering agency shall prepare and forward to the board of medical examiners a certified copy of the offender's TBI registration form within thirty (30) days of the sexual offender's or violent sexual offender's registration.

Upon receipt of the form, or upon receipt of credible evidence from any other source indicating that a person licensed to practice medicine in this state has been convicted of a sexual offense or a violent sexual offense, the board shall investigate to determine whether such person is a sexual offender or violent sexual offender, as defined by § 40-39-202, and a person licensed to practice medicine pursuant to this chapter.

If the board determines that the person named on the TBI registration form, or by another source, is a person licensed to practice medicine in this state pursuant to this chapter and the offense for which the person is required to register is a violent sexual offense, such conviction constitutes a material change in the person's licensure qualifications, and the board shall conduct a hearing at which the person may present evidence that the information received by the board is incorrect. If, after the hearing, the board finds the person was convicted of a violent sexual offense and is required to register with the TBI as a violent sexual offender, the board shall revoke the person's license to practice medicine in accordance with § 63-6-216. The person may appeal the ruling of the board as provided in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, but such appeal shall be limited to the issue of whether or not such person has been convicted of a violent sexual offense and is therefore required to register as a violent sexual offender. The license revocation shall remain in effect during the pendency of any appeal.

If the person licensed to practice medicine is required to register as a sexual offender, the board shall conduct a hearing to determine the extent to which the person poses a continuing risk to patients; the degree to which the person has been rehabilitated; what treatment, if any, the person has undergone; the areas of medicine in which the person is qualified to engage without endangering the safety of patients; and any other factor the board deems relevant in determining the outcome most likely to protect the public while considering the interests of the person. At the conclusion of the hearing, the board may:

Revoke the license of the person; or

If the board does not revoke the license, it may place such conditions on the person's license as it deems appropriate and advisable to protect the interests and safety of the public; provided, the board shall place the following restrictions on the person's license:

Prohibit the physician from engaging in direct patient care or contact; and

Such other conditions and limitations on the person's license as the board deems advisable.

If a person's license to practice medicine was revoked, suspended or conditioned pursuant to subdivision (c)(2)(C) because such person was convicted of a sexual offense and such person applies for and is granted termination of sexual offender registry requirements pursuant to § 40-39-207, such person may petition the board for reinstatement of the person's license to practice medicine.

If a petition is filed for reinstatement pursuant to this subsection (c), the board shall hear the petition within thirty (30) calendar days of its receipt. At the hearing the board shall use the same analysis set out in subdivision (c)(2)(C) to determine whether the person should be permitted to practice medicine in this state under any circumstances.

If the written findings of the board are that the person is no longer a threat to public safety and could return to the practice of medicine in some capacity, it may:

Reinstate the person's license without conditions;

Reinstate the person's license with any or all the conditions available under subdivision (c)(2)(C); or

Remove some or all of the restrictions or conditions that were placed on a license made conditional pursuant to subdivision (c)(2)(C).

If the written findings of the board are that the person could not safely return to the practice of medicine, it shall deny the person's petition and set a date certain after which the person may repetition the board.

If the board receives credible evidence from any source indicating that the person is in violation of the restrictions placed upon such person's license to practice medicine pursuant to this section, the board shall conduct a hearing as provided in subdivision (c)(2)(C). If at the conclusion of the hearing, the board finds that the person is in violation of the restrictions placed upon the person's license in a material respect or in a repetitive manner, the board shall revoke the license. If the board finds that the violation is minor or isolated, it may place other conditions on the person's license, such as increased reporting to the board by both the person and the person's employer or contractor, if any.

This subdivision (c)(2) shall apply regardless of whether commission of the sexual offense or violent sexual offense resulting in the person being required to register as a sexual or violent sexual offender occurred prior to or subsequent to the date the person was licensed to practice medicine in this state.

By September 1, 2010, the board shall compare or have compared a list of all persons who are licensed to practice medicine in this state against the list of persons who are registered as sexual offenders or violent sexual offenders pursuant to title 40, chapter 39, part 2. If it appears from this comparison that the same name appears on both lists, the board shall request a certified copy of that person's TBI registration form. Upon receipt of the form from the TBI, the board shall conduct an investigation to determine if the person licensed to practice medicine in this state is the same person who is a registered sexual offender or violent sexual offender. Such investigation shall take no more than thirty (30) days. If the board determines that the person whose name appears on both lists is the same person, it shall immediately take action as provided in subdivision (c)(2). If the person whose name appears on both lists is not the same person, the board shall take no action.

On July 1, 2010, the board shall determine, before granting a license to practice medicine in this state, or renewing an existing license, if the person who is applying for such a license is registered or is required to be registered as a sexual offender or violent sexual offender pursuant to title 40, chapter 39, part 2.

If any applicant for a license to practice medicine in this state is a registered violent sexual offender or is required to register as a violent sexual offender, the board shall deny the application. If any person who is licensed to practice medicine in this state and is seeking to renew such license is a registered violent sexual offender or is required to register as a violent sexual offender, the board shall revoke the physician's license.

If any applicant to the board is registered as a sexual offender or is required to register as a sexual offender, the board shall consider whether the applicant poses a risk to patients; the degree to which the person has been rehabilitated; what treatment, if any, the person has undergone; the areas of medicine in which the applicant is qualified to engage without endangering the safety of patients; and any other factor the board deems relevant in determining what conditions are most likely to protect the public while considering the interests of the applicant. The board may deny the application or may place such conditions upon the applicant as are necessary to protect the public. If the board grants the license, at a minimum the board shall prohibit the applicant from engaging in direct patient care or contact for so long as the applicant is required to register as a sexual offender.

Acts 2010, ch. 904 , § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2010, ch. 904, § 2 purported to add a new section concerning remedial action against persons licensed to practice medicine who are required to register as a sexual offender or violent sexual offender in order to assure safety as § 63-6-238. Since Acts 2005, ch. 53, § 3 added § 63-6-238, ch. 904, § 2 was added as § 63-6-240.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 904, § 3 provided that the act, which amended § 63-6-214(b)(10) and enacted § 63-6-240, shall apply to any person licensed to practice medicine in this state, whether such license was issued prior to or after July 1, 2010, and to any person applying to practice medicine in this state, whether the application was filed prior to or July 1, 2010.

63-6-241. Physical presence of physician required for abortion.

Notwithstanding § 63-6-209(b) or any other provision of this chapter, no physician licensed under this chapter or chapter 9 of this title shall perform or attempt to perform any abortion, including a medically induced abortion, or shall prescribe any drug or device intended to cause a medical abortion, except in the physical presence of the pregnant woman. No drug or device intended to cause a medical abortion shall be administered or dispensed to a pregnant woman except in the physical presence of her physician

Acts 2011, ch. 434, § 1; 2012, ch. 672, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 961, § 4 purported to enact a new § 63-6-241. Section 63-6-241 was previously enacted by Acts 2011, ch. 434, § 1, as amended by Acts 2012, ch. 672, § 1; § 63-6-242 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 818, § 1; and § 63-6-243 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 836, § 1; therefore, Acts 2012, ch. 961, § 4 was enacted as § 63-6-244 by authority of the code commission.

63-6-242. Employee or contractor's unauthorized use of medical doctor's DEA registration number to write prescriptions.

Any medical doctor licensed pursuant to this chapter who has reason to believe that an employee or contractor of the doctor or the doctor's firm, partnership or corporation has used the doctor's federal drug enforcement administration (DEA) registration number without authorization to write prescriptions may make a report to a law enforcement agency.

Any medical doctor, firm, partnership, or corporation making a report pursuant to subsection (a) shall be immune from any civil liability for making such report when made in good faith.

Acts 2012, ch. 818, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 836, § 1 purported to enact § 63-6-242. Section 63-6-242 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 818, § 1; therefore, Acts 2012, ch. 836, § 1 was enacted as § 63-6-243 by authority of the code commission.

Cross-References. Reporting persons obtaining or attempting to obtain controlled substances, § 53-11-309.

63-6-243. Hormone replacement therapy.

“Hormone replacement therapy clinic” or “hormone therapy clinic” means a medical office in which the clinicians are primarily engaged in hormone replacement or supplementation therapy or a medical office which holds itself out to the public as being primarily or substantially engaged in hormone replacement therapy. For the purposes of this definition, “primarily engaged” means that a majority of the clinic's patients receive hormone replacement therapy and may be further defined by the board by rule. “Hormone replacement therapy clinic” does not mean a medical office in which the clinicians are primarily engaged in obstetrics and gynecology (OB/GYN), urology or primary care.

“Hormone replacement therapy” or “hormone therapy” means the branch of the practice of medicine whereby the patient is treated with medications that include, but are not limited to, creams or natural formulas taken through the skin, under the tongue, in subcutaneous pellets, or orally that contain hormones that have the same bioidentical or similar chemical formula as those produced naturally in the human body or that the provider thinks or claims to be similar or identical, but shall not include the treatment of patients with birth control pills.

In hormone replacement therapy clinics:

All hormone replacement therapy shall be performed by a physician licensed under this chapter or chapter 9 of this title, or delegated by such physician to a certified nurse practitioner licensed pursuant to chapter 7 of this title or a physician assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 19 of this title; and

If hormone replacement therapy is delegated, the supervising physician shall ensure that written protocols are developed for licensees to whom hormone replacement therapy is delegated, that such protocols are updated as necessary and that the patient is informed of both the name and contact information of the supervising physician and an indication of whether the physician is available onsite or remotely.

A physician supervising hormone replacement therapy in a hormone replacement therapy clinic shall ensure that for each patient all of the following requirements are met:

Prior to the initial hormone replacement therapy or course of treatments, an appropriate physical examination shall be conducted;

An appropriate medical history shall be taken and documented on the patient;

A written order for hormone replacement therapy shall be entered by the treating provider in the patient's medical record documenting the diagnosis and medical reason for the patient's need for hormone replacement therapy. If the treating provider is not a physician, the supervising physician shall make a personal review of the historical, physical and therapeutic data gathered by the treating provider and shall so certify the review in the patient's chart within seven (7) days of the patient being served;

The patient gives written consent for hormone replacement therapy, which includes notification of possible complications and reasonable expectations and any applicable FDA warnings associated with any part of the therapy; and

The supervising physician shall be immediately notified upon discovery of a complication.

Acts 2012, ch. 836, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 836, § 1 purported to enact § 63-6-242. Section 63-6-242 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 818, § 1; therefore, Acts 2012, ch. 836, § 1 was enacted as § 63-6-243 by authority of the code commission.

63-6-244. Interventional pain management.

A physician licensed pursuant to this chapter may only practice interventional pain management if the licensee is either:

Board certified through the American Board of Medical Specialties (ABMS) or the American Board of Physician Specialties (ABPS)/American Association of Physician Specialists (AAPS) in one of the following medical specialties:

Anesthesiology;

Neurological surgery;

Orthopedic surgery;

Physical medicine and rehabilitation;

Radiology; or

Any other board certified physician who has completed an ABMS subspecialty board in pain medicine or completed an ACGME-accredited pain fellowship;

A recent graduate in a medical specialty listed in subdivision (a)(1) not yet eligible to apply for ABMS or ABPS/AAPS board certification; provided, that there is a practice relationship with a physician who meets the requirements of subdivision (a)(1) or an osteopathic physician who meets the requirements of § 63-9-121(a)(1);

A licensee who is not board certified in one of the specialties listed in subdivision (a)(1) but is board certified in a different ABMS or ABPS/AAPS specialty and has completed a post-graduate training program in interventional pain management approved by the board;

A licensee who serves as a clinical instructor in pain medicine at an accredited Tennessee medical training program; or

A licensee who has an active pain management practice in a clinic accredited in outpatient interdisciplinary pain rehabilitation by the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities or any successor organization.

For purposes of this section, “interventional pain management” is the practice of performing invasive procedures involving any portion of the spine, spinal cord, sympathetic nerves of the spine or block of major peripheral nerves of the spine in any setting not licensed under title 68, chapter 11.

The board is authorized to define through rulemaking the scope and length of the practice relationship established in subdivision (a)(2).

A physician who provides direct supervision of an advanced practice registered nurse or a physician's assistant pursuant to § 63-7-126 or § 63-19-107 must meet the requirements set forth in subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(3).

A physician who violates this section is subject to disciplinary action by the board pursuant to § 63-6-214, including, but not limited to, civil penalties of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for every day this section is violated.

Acts 2012, ch. 961, § 4; 2016, ch. 980, § 9.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 961, § 4 purported to enact a new § 63-6-241. Section 63-6-241 was previously enacted by Acts 2011, ch. 434, § 1, as amended by Acts 2012, ch. 672, § 1; § 63-6-242 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 818, § 1; and § 63-6-243 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 836, § 1; therefore, Acts 2012, ch. 961, § 4 was enacted as § 63-6-244 by authority of the code commission.

Attorney General Opinions. Administering spinal injections in unlicensed settings not permitted unless licensed physician is board certified or meets one of the other statutory requirements. OAG 14-49, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 51 (4/23/14)

63-6-245. Notice to patients of determination that patient has dense or extremely dense breasts.

As used in this section, “physician” means an individual authorized by this chapter to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery pursuant to chapter 9 of this title.

If a physician has determined, after a mammogram is performed, that a patient has dense breasts or extremely dense breasts, based on the breast imaging reporting and data system established by the American College of Radiology, the facility where the mammogram was performed shall provide the following notice to the patient:

Your mammogram shows that you have dense breast tissue. Dense breast tissue is common. However, dense breast tissue can hide breast cancer, so that it may not be seen on routine mammography. It may also be associated with an increased risk of developing breast cancer. You should discuss these results with your doctor to determine if additional tests might be helpful. A report of your mammogram results, which contains information about your breast density, has been sent to your doctor's office.

This section shall become operative on January 1, 2014. Nothing in this section shall be construed to create or impose liability for failing to comply with the requirements of this section. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to create a duty of care or other legal obligation beyond the duty to provide notice as set forth in this section. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to require a notice that is inconsistent with the federal Mammography Quality Standards Act (42 U.S.C. § 263b) or any regulations promulgated pursuant to that act.

Acts 2013, ch. 387, § 1; 2018, ch. 750, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 387, § 2 provided that the act, which enacted this section, may be known and cited as the “Breast Cancer Prevention Act.”

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, rewrote the notice in (b) which read: “Your mammogram shows that your breast tissue is dense. Dense breast tissue is common and is not abnormal. However, dense breast tissue can make it harder to evaluate the results of your mammogram and may also be associated with an increased risk of breast cancer. This information about the results of your mammogram is given to you to raise your awareness and to inform your conversations with your doctor. Together, you can decide which screening options are right for you. A report of your results was sent to your physician.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 750, § 2. July 1, 2018.

63-6-246. Maintenance of licensure or certification not required.

As used in this section:

“Continuing medical education” means continued postgraduate medical education required by the board of medical examiners intended to provide medical professionals with knowledge of new developments or reinforcement of previously learned information in their field;

“Maintenance of certification” means any process requiring periodic recertification examinations or other activities to maintain specialty medical board certification;

“Maintenance of licensure” means the proprietary framework for physician license renewal established through the Federation of State Medical Boards or its successor organization, which includes additional periodic testing or requirements other than continuing medical education; and

“Specialty medical board certification” means certification by a board that specializes in one (1) particular area of medicine and typically requires additional examinations other than the board of medical examiners' requirements to practice medicine.

The board shall not deny a physician licensure based on a physician's non-participation in any form of maintenance of licensure, including requiring any form of maintenance of licensure tied to maintenance of certification. The board's regular requirements, including continuing medical education, demonstrate professional competency.

The board shall not require any form of specialty medical board re-certification or any maintenance of certification to practice medicine in this state.

Acts 2017, ch. 438, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 438, § 4. May 25, 2017.

63-6-247. [Repealed.]

Acts 2018, ch. 1037, § 1; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 229, § 2, effective April 30, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-6-247 concerned acceptance of barter by physician as payment for rendering healthcare services.